Arkansas, session 2025, SB481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Cooperation by state entities with State
Captive Insurance Program.
The Insurance Commissioner, the State Insurance Department, the
Director of the Risk Management Division, the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, the Division of Higher Education, the
Commission for Arkansas Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation,
the Department of Education, and the State Board of Finance shall cooperate
with the State Captive Insurance Program and coordinate to ensure proper and
effective coverage requirements and guidelines for all buildings, structures,
facilities, and business personal property owned by a public school, a state-
supported institution of higher education, or the state for the benefit of
the State Captive Insurance Program.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Transitional provisions for property
insurance programs transferring to State Captive Insurance Program — Transfer
of property insurance programs administered by Director of Risk Management
Division.
(a) The property insurance programs administered by the Director of
the Risk Management Division are transferred to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, and the programs' authority, duties,
functions, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances
of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including without limitation
the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the State
Captive Insurance Program as it relates to the property insurance programs
only.
(b)(1) The Director of the Risk Management Division and the State
Insurance Department may continue to carry out the functions of the property
insurance programs until such time that the transfer of the property
insurance programs of the Department of Commerce - Division of Insurance -
Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust established under the Arkansas Multi-
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
Agency Insurance Trust Fund Act, § 25-35-101 et seq. and the Public School
Insurance Trust Fund established under the Public Elementary and Secondary
School Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq., from the State Insurance
Department to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services is
complete or November 30, 2025, whichever is earlier.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services may extend the date by rule only for purposes of adjustment and
payment of claims, as set out in Section 26 of this act.
(c) The Insurance Commissioner and the Director of the Risk Management
Division shall cooperate with the State Captive Insurance Program to ensure
an efficient and timely transition of operations once the State Captive
Insurance Program begins operations to provide coverage for all buildings,
structures, facilities, and business personal property owned by a public
school, a state-supported institution of higher education, or the state for
the benefit of the State Captive Insurance Program.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The property insurance programs for public schools, state-
supported institutions of higher education, and state-owned properties are in
a state of crisis;
(2) In 2023, the General Assembly authorized supplemental
funding to send to public schools for the purpose of offsetting premium
increases for public schools without implementing long-term systemic and
structural reforms;
(3) In addition to the need for short-term action by the General
Assembly to avert the impending premium increases for public schools, the
General Assembly must take an active role in crafting a long-term solution to
ensure the stability of the property insurance programs for public schools,
state-supported institutions of higher education, and state-owned properties;
(4) Significant market adjustments in response to natural
disasters in this state and in this country have resulted in the need for the
General Assembly to restructure and combine the property insurance programs
for public schools, state-supported institutions of higher education, and
state-owned properties under the State Captive Insurance Program created by
this act and to inject additional money into the State Captive Insurance
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
Program to maintain the integrity of the State Captive Insurance Program by
offsetting premium increases for public schools, state-supported institutions
of higher education, and state-owned properties;
(5) The use of public adjusting by certain public schools has
caused an increase in property insurance premiums and a lack of viable
options on the insurance market for future years;
(6) Properties of state-supported institutions of higher
education have historically been undervalued, and including state-supported
institutions of higher education in the State Captive Insurance Program will
provide more attractive options for the State Captive Insurance Program on
the insurance market;
(7) Properties of state-supported institutions of higher
education will need to be reappraised by independent adjusters under the
State Captive Insurance Program to ensure proper valuation of properties;
(8) The continual evaluation of the State Captive Insurance
Program by the General Assembly is critical for:
(A) Maximizing the benefits to public schools, state-
supported institutions of higher education, and the state that are
participants in the State Captive Insurance Program; and
(B) Maintaining the continued viability of the State
Captive Insurance Program; and
(9) Accountability and transparency in the operation of the
State Captive Insurance Program are vital to a proper evaluation of the State
Captive Insurance Program.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The property insurance programs for public schools, state-
supported institutions of higher education, and state-owned property are
restructured and combined for public schools, state-supported institutions of
higher education, and state-owned property under the State Captive Insurance
Program;
(2) Additional money shall be injected into the State Captive
Insurance Program to maintain the integrity of the State Captive Insurance
Program by managing risks for public schools, state-supported institutions of
higher education, and the state;
(3) Any additional funding provided for public schools or state-
supported institutions of higher education for purposes of property insurance
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
during the Regular Session of the 95th General Assembly be considered a one-
time infusion of money, not a permanent funding source;
(4) Funding will be calculated under the State Captive Insurance
Program with meaningful reforms that restore permanent stability and
actuarial soundness;
(5) The use of public adjusting is prohibited by public schools
and state-supported institutions of higher education under the State Captive
Insurance Program; and
(6) The Insurance Commissioner, the State Insurance Department,
the Director of the Risk Management Division, the Secretary of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services, the Division of Higher Education, the
Commission for Arkansas Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation,
the Department of Education, and the State Board of Finance shall coordinate
to ensure proper and effective coverage requirements and guidelines for all
buildings, structures, facilities, and business personal property owned by a
public school, state-supported institution of higher education, or the state
for the benefit of the State Captive Insurance Program.
(c) The General Assembly intends this transfer to streamline the
delivery of property insurance coverage for all state-owned buildings, public
schools and state-supported institutions of higher education to promote
stability and fiduciary soundness for all structures covered and potential
claims.
(d)(1) The property insurance programs of the Department of Commerce -
Division of Insurance - Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust established
under the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund Act, § 25-35-101 et seq.
and the Public School Insurance Trust Fund established under the Public
Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq., shall be
transferred by cabinet-level department transfer under § 25-43-101 et seq.,
from the Department of Commerce to the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services no later than December 1, 2025, to provide for the operation
of the State Captive Insurance Program.
(2) The Department of Commerce and the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services shall coordinate the transfer to coincide
with the start date of the State Captive Insurance Program established under
§ 25-44-103.
(e) The transfer of the statutory authority, powers, duties,
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
functions, records, personnel, property, contracts, and unexpended balances
of appropriations, allocations, or other funds shall begin at the direction
of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State in cooperation with the Secretary of
the Department of Commerce and the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services on July 1, 2025, and shall be fully
complete by December 1, 2026, for the establishment of the State Captive
Insurance Program.
(f) The orders, rules, regulations, directives, or standards in this
section shall continue with full force and effect until amended or repealed
under authority given by law.
(g) The Department of Commerce shall grant access to and provide all
information requested by the Department of Transformation and Shared Services
to accomplish the transfer of the property insurance coverage from the
Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund and the Public School Insurance
Trust Fund and the missions of these programs to the new State Captive
Insurance Program.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-20-1503 is amended to read as follows:
6-20-1503. State Insurance Department — Powers and duties regarding
cybersecurity risks insurance for public elementary and secondary schools.
It shall be the power and duty of the State Insurance Department to:
(1) Adopt such rules as may be necessary to provide for the
insuring of public elementary and secondary school, education service
cooperative, and open-enrollment public charter school property cybersecurity
risks insurance within the State of Arkansas;
(2) Administer the Public School Insurance Trust Fund;
(3) Delegate responsibilities in connection with the
administration of this subchapter to the Director of the Risk Management
Division and the staff of the department;
(4)(A) Establish and administer a program of insurance to cover
buildings and contents cybersecurity risks insurance of public school
districts, education service cooperatives, and open-enrollment public charter
schools of this state that have elected to participate in a multischool
insurance program.
(B) The programs program shall be in accordance with
recognized and established insurance practices;
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
(5) Establish, and from time to time modify, the premium rates
to be charged for the various risks;
(6) Specify the form for insurance policies and other forms
required for the purposes of this subchapter;
(7)(A) Purchase insurance in compliance with all state
purchasing laws from insurance companies authorized to do business in this
state in keeping with recognized principles of good risk management.
(B) The director shall prescribe, from time to time, rules
for placing and handling the insurance;
(8) Employ necessary adjusters, engineers, appraisers, and other
personnel required in the administration of this subchapter;
(9) Engage in a program of prevention loss control to assist the
various public schools in improving and minimizing potential insurance
losses;
(10)(9) Perform all additional powers and duties necessary to
maintain sound insurance underwriting practices recognized by good risk
management;
(11)(10) Periodically review the status of the fund and the
adequacy of insurance premium rates and compare these rates with rates for
comparable risks for private insurance companies;
(12)(11) Confer with superintendents and boards of directors of
school districts, the governing boards of education service cooperatives, and
open-enrollment public charter schools concerning insurance practices of the
various school districts, education service cooperatives, and open-enrollment
public charter schools;
(13)(12) Promulgate rules for the administration of the state
public school cybersecurity risks insurance program; and
(14)(13) Perform other duties that will expedite the operation
of the Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Program.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-20-1505 is amended to read as follows:
6-20-1505. Information to be furnished.
(a) The Director of the Risk Management Division of the State
Insurance Department, with the approval of the Insurance Commissioner, shall
require school district superintendents, county school supervisors, clerks,
or governing boards of the education service cooperatives or open-enrollment
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
public charter schools to furnish the State Insurance Department a complete
list showing the location of every school building sixty (60) days before
entering the program and upon written request by the department.
(b) The department State Insurance Department shall have authority to
require each school district, education service cooperative, or open-
enrollment public charter school to furnish a complete report of its
cybersecurity risks insurance program, including the expiration dates of its
contracts, a history of losses, or any additional information required by the
insurer.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-20-1506 is amended to read as follows:
6-20-1506. Finding of uninsurability — Effect.
(a)(1) The State Insurance Department is authorized to maintain an
inspection and engineering service and a training program designed to reduce
the hazards in public school buildings insured under this program.
(2) The department shall have authority to cancel or not renew
insurance on any school property if the property is deemed no longer
insurable.
(3) The department may refuse to insure property insured for
cybersecurity risks when it determines that the property does not meet
program guidelines for cybersecurity risks insurance coverage.
(b) In carrying out its duties pursuant to this section, the The
department may request and the affected school district shall provide any
information requested for a determination concerning the reasons for the a
denial, nonrenewal, or cancellation of cybersecurity risks insurance
coverage.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-20-1508 is amended to read as follows:
6-20-1508. Appraisal and payment Payment of losses.
(a) In the event of loss of a school district, education service
cooperative, or open-enrollment public charter school property under the
Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Program, the Public School
Insurance Trust Fund shall pay the loss as specified in the contract.
(b) When an agreement as to the extent of loss or damage cannot be
reached between the State Insurance Department and officials having charge of
the property, the amount of the loss or damage shall be determined by three
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
(3) appraisers, one (1) to be named by the department, one (1) by the school
district, education service cooperative, or open-enrollment public charter
school governing board, and a third to be selected by the two (2) appointed
appraisers, all of whom shall be disinterested persons and qualified from
experience to appraise and value such property.
(c) If a third appraiser is not agreed upon within thirty (30) days,
the Insurance Commissioner shall have authority to appoint a third appraiser.
(d) It shall be the duty of the department to coordinate, facilitate,
and expedite details in connection with responsibilities outlined in this
section.
(e) The department is granted authority to contract for services with
licensed real estate brokers in order to expedite and facilitate the proper
operation of the program.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-20-1513 is repealed.
6-20-1513. Bond obligations.
(a) The State Insurance Department is authorized and directed to meet
legal requirements with reference to coverage on buildings as a result of
school district, education service cooperative, or open-enrollment public
charter school bond obligations.
(b) The specific intent of this section is to ensure that policies
issued by the Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Program
include provisions required by existing school district bond contracts.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-21-114(d) and (e), concerning authorized
and required actions of the Commission for Arkansas Public School Academic
Facilities and Transportation, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The commission shall:
(1) Oversee the operations of the Division of Public School
Academic Facilities and Transportation;
(2)(A) Promulgate rules in consultation with the Insurance
Commissioner Department of Transformation and Shared Services to establish
property, boiler and machinery, and extended coverage insurance requirements
and guidelines for all buildings, structures, facilities, and business
personal property owned by a school district.
(B) The rules promulgated by the commission under
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section shall:
(i) Attempt to provide the most cost-efficient
manner for protecting each school district from loss of or damage to the
school district's buildings, structures, facilities, and business personal
property;
(ii) Require property, boiler and machinery, and
extended coverage insurers to have a minimum A.M. Best rating;
(iii) Establish bidding requirements and procedures,
if applicable to any insurance coverage; and
(iv)(a)(iii)(a) Be binding upon each school district
for any placement or renewal of insurance coverage after June 1, 2007.
(b) The state's financial participation under
the Academic Facilities Partnership Program provided by § 6-20-2507 or the
Academic Facilities Catastrophic Program provided by § 6-20-2508 may be
withheld or reduced by the commission if a school district does not comply
with the rules promulgated under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section; and
(iv) Require a public school district to be insured
under the State Captive Insurance Program with respect to insurance coverage
of the buildings, structures, facilities, and business personal property
owned by the public school district in order to be eligible for the state's
financial participation under the Academic Facilities Partnership Program
under § 6-20-2507 and the Academic Facilities Catastrophic Program under § 6-
20-2508; and
(3) Appoint all members of the Advisory Committee on Public
School Academic Facilities.
(e) The commission may:
(1) Perform any act and provide for the performance of any
function necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of the Arkansas
Public School Academic Facilities Program and any other related program;
(2)(A) Adopt, amend, and rescind rules as necessary or desirable
for the administration of the Arkansas Public School Academic Facilities
Program and any other related program.
(B) The commission shall report to the Administrative
Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council in a manner consistent with §
10-3-309 on the adoption, amendment, rescission, or repeal of any proposed
rule related to the administration of the Arkansas Public School Academic
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
Facilities Funding Act, § 6-20-2501 et seq., the Arkansas Public School
Academic Facilities Program Act, § 6-21-801 et seq., or any other related
program;
(3) Contract with, retain the services of, or designate and fix
the compensation of consultants, advisors, architects, engineers, and other
independent contractors as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the
Arkansas Public School Academic Facilities Program or any related program;
and
(4) Study and promulgate rules in consultation with the
department concerning:
(A) The propriety and feasibility of requiring that each
school district maintain insurance coverage against loss due to:
(i) Earth earth movement; or
(ii) The operation of a school district's motor
vehicles and buses; and
(B) The appropriate amount of insurance coverage under
this subdivision (e)(4); and
(5) Study and promulgate rules in consultation with the
Insurance Commissioner concerning:
(A) The propriety and feasibility of requiring that each
school district maintain insurance coverage against loss due to the operation
of a school district's motor vehicles and buses; and
(B) The appropriate amount of insurance coverage under
this subdivision (e)(5).

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-21-806 is amended to read as follows:
6-21-806. Academic Facilities Master Plan Program — School districts.
(a) The Academic Facilities Master Plan Program shall require each
school district to:
(1) Develop a six-year districtwide facilities master plan that
shall be approved by the school district's board of directors for submission
to and approval by the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation and the Department of Transformation and Shared Services;
(2) Base its facilities master plan on the provisions:
(A) Provisions of the Arkansas Public School Academic
Facility Manual as adopted by the Commission for Arkansas Public School
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
Academic Facilities and Transportation, on priorities;
(B) Priorities indicated by statewide assessment, on
priorities;
(C) Priorities established by the division statewide
facility needs priority list, and on other;
(D) Rules promulgated by the department as they relate to
requirements associated with public school district schedules for
maintenance, repair, and renovation activities in public school academic and
nonacademic facilities; and
(E) Other pertinent data specific to the needs of the
school district with regard to academic facilities and equipment;
(3) Present a draft of the school district's facilities master
plan in a public hearing in the same locality as the school district and take
public comments;
(4) Submit evidence of the school district's insurance coverage
to the division and the department, including coverage amounts, types of
coverage, identification of buildings covered, policy renewal dates, and all
riders;
(5) Submit the school district's facilities master plan with a
summary of comments made at public hearing to the division and the department
by February 1 of each even-numbered year;
(6) Submit a report to the division and the department by
February 1 of each odd-numbered year that includes a description of all
projects completed in the school district since the submission of the school
district's most recent facilities master plan, the school district's current
enrollment projections, new or continuing needs of the school district with
regard to academic facilities and equipment, and an accounting of any changes
in the school district's insurance coverage from the most recent submission;
and
(7)(A) Submit a report to the division and the department by
February 1 of each year that identifies:
(i) All unused or underutilized public school
facilities in the school district; and
(ii) The unused or underutilized public school
facilities, if any, that are designated in the district's facilities master
plan to be reused, renovated, or demolished as part of a specific committed
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
project or planned new construction project.
(B)(i) The division shall identify a public school
facility or other real property as an unused or underutilized public school
facility if the school district fails to identify in the report the public
school facility or other real property.
(ii) A school district may appeal an identification
made by the division under subdivision (a)(7)(B)(i) of this section to the
commission.
(b) A facilities master plan shall include, at a minimum, the
following:
(1) A schedule of custodial activities for each public school
facility used by a school district;
(2)(A) A schedule of maintenance, repair, and renovation
activities for each public school facility used by a school district, that
shall be based on the rules promulgated by the department.
(B) The schedule shall distinguish between work associated
with academic facilities and work associated with nonacademic public school
facilities;
(3)(A) Documentation that describes preventive maintenance work
for each public school facility as required by rules promulgated by the
department and identifies the completion date of the work.
(B) The documentation shall distinguish between preventive
maintenance work associated with academic facilities and preventive
maintenance work associated with nonacademic public school facilities;
(4)(A) Annual expenditures of the school district for all
custodial, maintenance, repair, and renovation activities in the school
district.
(B) The section of the facilities master plan pertaining
to the annual expenditures under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section shall
distinguish between expenditures associated with academic facilities and
expenditures associated with nonacademic public school facilities;
(5) A projected replacement schedule for major building systems
in each public school facility, that shall be based on the rules promulgated
by the department;
(6) Identification of issues with regard to public school
facility and program access to individuals with disabilities and, if
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
necessary, proposed methods for improving access;
(7)(A) Identification of committed projects within the school
district that includes, as applicable, a breakdown of the portion of each
project into maintenance, repair, and renovation activities and new
construction activities, that shall be based on the rules promulgated by the
department.
(B) The portion of a committed project pertaining to
maintenance, repair, and renovation activities shall identify, as applicable,
maintenance, repair, and renovation activities associated with academic
facilities and maintenance, repair, and renovation activities associated with
nonacademic public school facilities;
(8) Annual expenditures of the school district for capital
outlay;
(9) A description of planned new construction projects with cost
estimates for each public school facility within the school district and
needs prioritized as follows:
(A) Immediate needs that the school district intends to
address within three (3) years following the submission of the facilities
master plan; and
(B) Long-term needs that the school district intends to
address within the four (4) to six (6) years following the submission of the
facilities master plan;
(10) Evidence of the school district's insurance coverage,
including coverage amounts, types of coverage, identification of public
school facilities covered, policy renewal dates, and all riders; and
(11) An update in a format prescribed by the division of any new
public school facilities, as defined in § 6-21-803, constructed since the
last master plan submission, including individual room types and sizes.
(c) A consultation meeting between representatives of the school
district and members of the division and the department to discuss the
development of the school district's facilities master plan shall be held
upon request of the school district.
(d) The division and the department shall review and upon all
requirements' requirements being met approve a school district's facilities
master plan no later than September 1 of each even-numbered year and shall
notify a school district no later than May 1 of each odd-numbered year
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
whether the school district's application for state financial participation
during the upcoming biennium in an eligible new construction project has been
approved.
(e)(1) A school district may amend its facilities master plans at any
time during the six-year cycle specified in § 6-21-803.
(2) An amendment may be submitted to the division and the
department out of the regular even-numbered year cycle if the school
district:
(A) Has encountered:
(i) A major enrollment change;
(ii) A major curriculum change;
(iii) A major disaster; or
(iv) An unforeseen occurrence; or
(B)(i) Has begun or completed a self-funded construction
project over which the division has only review authority.
(ii) An amendment submitted under subdivision
(e)(2)(B)(i) of this section may be submitted in the form of an appendix to
the existing school district facilities master plan.
(f) In addition to the rules promulgated by the commission as required
by § 6-21-804, the department, in consultation with the division, shall
promulgate rules regarding the following without limitation:
(1) The requirements associated with public school district
schedules for maintenance, repair, and renovation activities in public school
academic and nonacademic facilities, that shall be included in the Public
School Facilities Custodial, Maintenance, Repair, and Renovation Manual
required by § 6-21-808;
(2) Insurance coverage requirements, including without
limitation:
(A) Insurance coverage amounts; and
(B) Types of insurance coverage;
(3) Preventive maintenance work requirements for each public
school academic and nonacademic facility;
(4) Projected replacement schedule requirements for major
building systems in each public school academic and nonacademic facility; and
(5) A depreciation schedule for roofs and heating, ventilation,
and air conditioning systems.
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 10-3-320 is amended to read as follows:
10-3-320. Employee Benefits Division State Insurance Programs
Oversight Subcommittee — Definition.
(a) The Legislative Council shall establish by rule the Employee
Benefits Division State Insurance Programs Oversight Subcommittee, which
shall have oversight of all decisions of the State Board of Finance related
to the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program and the
State Captive Insurance Program.
(b) The following decisions of the board pertaining to the program
State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program or the State
Captive Insurance Program shall be referred to the Employee Benefits Division
State Insurance Programs Oversight Subcommittee:
(1)(A) A new or significantly modified cost-containment measure.
(B) As used in this subdivision (b)(1), “cost-containment
measure” means a process or practice of controlling and managing expenses of
the program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program or the
State Captive Insurance Program by reducing or limiting the amount of
spending required to administer the program State and Public School Life and
Health Insurance Program or the State Captive Insurance Program and remain
within specific, preplanned budgetary constraints;
(2) Any change in plan options offered under the:
(A) program State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program for state employees or public school employees; or
(B) State Captive Insurance Program for property owned by
public schools, state-supported institutions of higher education, or the
state;
(3) Potential funding changes to the program State and Public
School Life and Health Insurance Program or the State Captive Insurance
Program;
(4) Any premium increases or decreases over the previous plan
year;
(5) Any concern involving the reserve balance for state
employees or public school employees the State and Public School Life and
Health Insurance Program or the State Captive Insurance Program;
(6) Changes to the four-year projections for the program State
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program or the State Captive
Insurance Program;
(7) Changes that would limit, eliminate, or increase benefits of
plan options offered under the program State and Public School Life and
Health Insurance Program or the State Captive Insurance Program and the
effect these changes would have on the fiscal viability of the program State
and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program or the State Captive
Insurance Program, including the reserve balance for state employees or
public school employees the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance
Program or the State Captive Insurance Program;
(8) Changes that would limit, eliminate, or increase eligibility
requirements for the program State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program or the State Captive Insurance Program;
(9) Vendor issues or changes in vendors from the previous plan
year;
(10) Proposed contracts or changes in contracts from the
previous plan year;
(11) Any change in consultants from the previous plan year;
(12) Rules promulgated by the board, or by the Employee Benefits
Division, or by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services regarding the implementation, administration, or enforcement of the
program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program or the
State Captive Insurance Program; and
(13) Such other matters related to the program State and Public
School Life and Health Insurance Program or the State Captive Insurance
Program as the Employee Benefits Division State Insurance Programs Oversight
Subcommittee considers necessary to perform its oversight of all matters
related to the program State and Public School Life and Health Insurance
Program or the State Captive Insurance Program.
(c)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, if a
matter referred to the Employee Benefits Division State Insurance Programs
Oversight Subcommittee under subsection (b) of this section would otherwise
require review or approval, or both, by a subcommittee of the Legislative
Council, the Employee Benefits Division State Insurance Programs Oversight
Subcommittee shall serve as the subcommittee of the Legislative Council that
performs the required review or approval, or both, of the matter.
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
(2) Proposed rules submitted to the Employee Benefits Division
State Insurance Programs Oversight Subcommittee under this section are not
subject to approval by the Employee Benefits Division State Insurance
Programs Oversight Subcommittee but are submitted for review purposes only.
(d)(1) During a regular, fiscal, or extraordinary session of the
General Assembly, the Joint Budget Committee shall perform the functions
assigned to the Employee Benefits Division State Insurance Programs Oversight
Subcommittee.
(2) The Joint Budget Committee may establish a subcommittee to
perform the functions of the Employee Benefits Division State Insurance
Programs Oversight Subcommittee that are assigned to the Joint Budget
Committee under subdivision (d)(1) of this section.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 3, Subchapter 7, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-3-706. Authority to establish and maintain captive insurance
company.
(a) With the approval of the State Board of Finance under this section
and notwithstanding § 23-63-1625, the Treasurer of State may establish, and
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall
maintain, a captive insurance company as defined in § 23-63-1601 to maintain
the State Captive Insurance Program under the State Captive Insurance Program
Act, § 25-44-101 et seq.
(b) The captive insurance company described under subsection (a) of
this section is:
(1) Subject to § 23-63-1601 et seq. and other applicable laws
and rules, whether or not adequate insurance markets are available to cover
the risks, hazards, and liabilities described in this section;
(2) A separate legal entity, owned and controlled by the state,
and shall insure only the losses, exposures, and risks of entities that are
subject to insurance and self-insurance requirements under state law,
including without limitation executive, legislative, and judicial branch
state agencies, public schools, and state-supported institutions of higher
education; and
(3) Administratively attached to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services for the purposes of administration and
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
personnel.
(c) Through the establishment of the captive insurance company
described under subsection (a) of this section, the board shall:
(1) Annually review and approve the captive insurance company's
actuarial plan;
(2) Periodically determine, reevaluate, and revise:
(A) The potential losses, exposures, and risks that will
be insured through the captive insurance company;
(B) The nature and scope of insurance coverage or
coverages to be provided through the captive insurance company;
(C) The method by which coverage or coverages are to be
extended and contributions are to be paid and collected, including without
limitation premiums and assessments;
(D) The amount of the exposure for each line of insurance
coverage as well as the premium amounts for each entity, including without
limitation public schools, state-supported institutions of higher education,
and the state;
(E) A process through which premiums may be collected
directly from each entity; and
(F)(i) The initial and continuing capital requirements to
form and maintain the captive insurance company, including without limitation
the amount and funding source for the initial and continuing capital.
(ii) Initial or continuing capital may be funded by
general revenues from the State Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund or other
sources allowable under applicable laws and rules;
(3)(A) Establish an investment policy for the investment and
reinvestment of capital, premiums, and other funds and assets of the captive
insurance company.
(B) The investment policy described under subdivision
(c)(3)(A) of this section may authorize the funds and assets to be invested
in a security, investment, or investment interest that is not otherwise
prohibited by Arkansas Constitution, Article 12, § 5.
(C) Collateral that is required to secure an investment or
investment interest authorized in the investment policy may be in the form of
a security, investment, or investment interest in which the funds and assets
of the captive insurance company may be directly invested, including cash;
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
(4) Approve regulatory filings to be made by the state on behalf
of the captive insurance company in compliance with applicable laws and
rules;
(5)(A) Delegate to the secretary the day-to-day operations and
responsibilities of the captive insurance company and promulgation of rules
to implement this section.
(B) The secretary shall implement the board directives and
exercise the state's powers, duties, and responsibilities contained in this
section to implement the captive insurance company.
(C) The secretary may assign duties and responsibilities
to the secretary's staff or private vendors and contractors, as the secretary
deems necessary and proper, and may consult with professionals as necessary
about the administration of the captive insurance company.
(D) The secretary may also establish, implement, and adopt
policies, guidelines, and operating procedures under this section and the
board's delegation;
(6) Approve the dissolution of the captive insurance company
with the prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee; and
(7) Perform other duties or actions necessary for the effective
implementation, operation, and administration of the captive insurance
company.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1134 is amended to read as follows:
19-5-1134. Public School Insurance Trust Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Public School Insurance Trust Fund”.
(b) The Public School Insurance Trust Fund shall consist of:
(1) A Permanent Insurance Reserve Fund, insurance premiums,
adjustments, earnings, interest income, and the like, as provided by the
Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq.,
and the School Motor Vehicle Insurance Act, § 6-21-701 et seq.; and
(2) All funds transferred from the former Public Elementary and
Secondary School Insurance Fund established under §§ 6-20-1510 [repealed] and
19-5-908 [repealed]; and
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
(3) All funds transferred from the former School Vehicle
Insurance Reserve Trust Fund established under §§ 6-21-710 and 19-5-981
[repealed].
(c)(1) The Public School Insurance Trust Fund shall be used for the
operation, maintenance, and execution of the Public Elementary and Secondary
School Insurance Program under the Public Elementary and Secondary School
Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq., and the Public School Motor Vehicle
Insurance Program under the School Motor Vehicle Insurance Act, § 6-21-701 et
seq.
(2) No money shall be appropriated from the Public School
Insurance Trust Fund for any purpose except for the use and benefit of the
Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Program and the Public
School Motor Vehicle Insurance Program.
(3) All funds received by the State Insurance Department in the
administration of the Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance
Program and the Public School Motor Vehicle Insurance Program as premiums,
adjustments, earnings, and the like:
(A) Shall be used for the following purposes, listed in a
descending order of priority:
(i) To defray administrative costs;
(ii) To pay claims; and
(iii) To maintain the Public School Insurance Trust
Fund; and
(B) May be invested and reinvested as the Insurance
Commissioner may determine.
(4) Moneys invested and interest earned thereon shall be
administered as program funds.
(5) All moneys deposited into the Public School Insurance Trust
Fund shall not be subject to any deduction, tax, levy, or any other type of
assessment.
(d) The initial loan from the former Public Elementary and Secondary
School Insurance Fund as established by the Public Elementary and Secondary
School Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq., of one million five hundred
thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to fund the former School Vehicle Insurance
Reserve Trust Fund established under the School Motor Vehicle Insurance Act,
§ 6-21-701 et seq., is cancelled.
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 11, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1161. State Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the "State Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund".
(b) The State Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund shall consist of
all funds transferred by the Department of Transformation and Shared Services
from the captive insurance company established under § 19-3-706 and any other
funds provided by law.
(c)(1) The State Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund shall be
administered by and disbursed at the direction of the state.
(2) Moneys shall not be appropriated from the State Captive
Insurance Program Trust Fund for any purpose except for:
(A) The use and benefit of the captive insurance company
established under § 19-3-706 for claims;
(B) Expenses of the captive insurance company established
under § 19-3-706, including without limitation actuarial fees, consultant
expenses, operating expenses, and service contract fees; and
(C) The personnel costs for the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services to support the captive insurance company
established under § 19-3-706.
(3) All moneys deposited into the State Captive Insurance
Program Trust Fund shall not be subject to any deduction, tax, levy, or any
other type of assessment.
(d)(1) There is created a reserve balance sub-fund in the State
Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund as authorized under § 25-44-105 with all
requirements as defined in that section.
(2) Funding allocated for operations and claims for the State
Captive Insurance Program shall not be considered part of the net legal
balance of the reserve balance sub-fund as described in § 25-44-105.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1614, concerning the premium tax
levied on captive insurers, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
(k) This section does not apply to a captive insurance company
established under § 19-3-706 to administer a public elementary and secondary
school, state-supported institution of higher education, and state-owned
property insurance program.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 63, Subchapter 16, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-63-1625. Authority for expenditure of public funds.
The state or a political subdivision of the state may expend public
funds for the purchase of capital stock in a captive insurance company
established under § 19-3-706.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 23-65-315 is amended to read as follows:
23-65-315. Tax on surplus lines brokers.
(a) No Except as otherwise provided in this section, no later than
sixty (60) days following the end of the calendar quarter in which surplus
lines insurance was procured, the surplus lines broker shall remit to the
Treasurer of State through the Insurance Commissioner a tax of four percent
(4%) on the direct premiums written, less return premiums and exclusive of
sums collected to cover state or federal taxes, on surplus lines insurance
subject to tax transacted by the surplus lines broker during the preceding
calendar quarter for the privilege of transacting business as a surplus lines
broker in this state.
(b) The commissioner may participate in a multistate agreement or
enter into a compact for the purpose of reporting, collecting, and
apportioning surplus lines insurance premium taxes.
(c) If a surplus lines insurance policy covers risks or exposures only
partially in this state and the commissioner has entered into an agreement
with other states for the apportionment of premium taxes for multistate
risks, the tax payable by the surplus lines broker shall be computed and paid
on the proportion of the premium that is properly allocable to the risks or
exposures located in this state according to the terms of the agreement.
(d) This section does not apply to a captive insurance company
established under § 19-3-706 to administer a public elementary and secondary
school, state-supported institutions of higher education, and state-owned
property insurance program.
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 25-35-102 is amended to read as follows:
25-35-102. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Annual aggregate deductible” means the maximum amount
payable annually from the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund for
covered losses;
(2) “Insurance Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner of
the State Insurance Department or the commissioner's successor;
(3) "Risk manager" means the Administrator of the Risk
Management Division of the State Insurance Department;
(4)(3) "State agency" means any state agency, board, bureau,
commission, council, department, institution, or other similar entity; and
(5)(4) "Trust fund" means the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance
Trust Fund.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 25-35-103(b), concerning the purposes of
the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) No money shall be appropriated from the Arkansas Multi-Agency
Insurance Trust Fund for any purpose except to pay:
(1) Insurance and reinsurance premiums for a motor vehicle;
(2) Loss adjustment expenses;
(3) Related educational and training expenses;
(4) Insured claims falling below the annual aggregate deductible
level;
(5) Expenses including actuarial, consultant, and service
contract fees; and
(6) Cybersecurity risk insurance premiums and expenses.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 25-35-104(a), concerning the agencies that
are allowed to participate in the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) The following agencies shall participate in the Arkansas Multi-
Agency Insurance Trust Fund:
(1) State agencies participating in the State Master Property
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
Policy as of June 30, 2003;
(2) The Division of Correction;
(3)(2) The Division of Community Correction; and
(4)(3) State agencies participating in the Arkansas State Master
Vehicle Policy as of June 30, 2003; and
(4) State agencies participating in the Arkansas Multi-Agency
Insurance Trust Cyber Liability Insurance Program as of June 30, 2025.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 25-35-105(b), concerning the duties of the
risk manager of the State Insurance Department, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) At the discretion of the commissioner, the risk manager may:
(1) Enter into contracts;
(2) Purchase insurance and reinsurance in accordance with the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq.;
(3) Adjust, settle, and pay or deny claims with notice to a
claimant;
(4) Pay expenses and costs;
(5) Study the risks of all participating state agencies and
properties their the state agencies' motor vehicle or cybersecurity risk
insurance coverages;
(6) Promulgate the form for insurance and reinsurance policies
and other forms;
(7) Issue certificates of coverage to state agencies for any
risks covered by the trust fund;
(8) Make recommendations about risk management and risk
reduction strategies to participating state agencies;
(9) Review participating state agency building construction,
major remodeling plans, program plans, and make recommendations to the
participating state agency about needed changes to address risk
considerations;
(10) Utilize underwriting discretion and authority to deny
coverage of any risk deemed to adversely affect the financial stability of
the trust fund;
(11) Establish values for participating state agency buildings
and structures to be insured;
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
(12)(10) Attend state agency planning and management meetings;
(13)(11) Review any proposed legislation and communicate with
members of the General Assembly and legislative committees about the
liability or risk management issues connected with any legislation; and
(14)(12) Solicit any needed information about state agency
plans, state agency programs, or state agency risks necessary to perform the
responsibilities under this chapter.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 25-35-107 is amended to read as follows:
25-35-107. Payment of losses.
The risk manager shall establish:
(1) Appropriate policies and procedures governing the payment of
losses from the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund, including notice
or proof of loss by any participating state agency; and
(2) Policies and procedures governing disputes that may arise
between the risk manager and any person having charge over the property motor
vehicle or cybersecurity risk insurance in question concerning the extent of
loss or damage.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 25-35-108 is repealed.
25-35-108. Limits on use of risk management data as evidence.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any report, recommendation,
survey, schedule, list, or data compiled, or action taken or not taken by or
at the request of the risk manager to identify, evaluate, or plan the safety
enhancement or risk reduction of any potential accident sites or other
hazards related to any entity covered by the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance
Trust Fund may not be admitted into evidence in any court or used for any
other purposes in any action for damages arising from any occurrence at a
location mentioned or addressed in the reports, recommendation, survey,
schedule, list, or data.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code Title 25, is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:

CHAPTER 44
STATE CAPTIVE INSURANCE PROGRAM ACT
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481

25-44-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Captive
Insurance Program Act”.

25-44-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Cost-containment measure" means a process or practice of
controlling and managing expenses of the State Captive Insurance Program
established under § 19-5-706 by reducing or limiting the amount of spending
required to administer the program and remain within specific and preplanned
budgetary constraints;
(2) "Insured entity" means a public school or state agency
insured under this chapter;
(3)(A) "Public insurance adjuster" means:
(i) An individual who, for direct, indirect, or any
other compensation:
(a) Acts on behalf of an insured in
negotiating for or effecting the settlement of a claim or claims for loss or
damage under a policy of insurance coverage real or personal property; or
(b) On behalf of any other public insurance
adjuster, investigates, settles, or adjusts, advises, or assists an insured
with a claim or claims for loss or damage under any policy of insurance
covering real or personal property; or
(ii) An individual who advertises, solicits
business, or holds himself or herself out to the public as an adjuster of
claims for loss or damage under any policy of insurance covering real or
personal property.
(B) "Public insurance adjuster" does not mean an
individual employed by the State Captive Insurance Program or employed for
the benefit of the program;
(4) "Public school" means a public elementary school, a public
secondary school, an education service cooperative, an open-enrollment public
charter school, or a state-supported institution of higher education; and
(5) "State agency" means any state agency, board, bureau,
commission, council, department, division, institution, or other similar
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
entity.

25-44-103. State Captive Insurance Program — Creation — Mandatory
participation.
(a) There is established the State Captive Insurance Program.
(b) The program shall be a system of insurance provided by a captive
insurance company established under § 19-3-706 for public schools and state-
owned properties.
(c) If a public school or state agency with state-owned property
accepts a state appropriation for a facility, then the public school or state
agency with state-owned property shall participate in the program.

25-44-104. Department of Transformation and Shared Services — Powers
and duties regarding insurance for insured entities.
(a) Upon the State Board of Finance's approval of the formation of the
captive insurance company described under § 19-3-706, the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall:
(1) Provide administrative support and employ staff to
implement, administer, and operate the captive insurance company;
(2) Facilitate the creation, implementation, or modification of
the insurance policy issued by the captive insurance company;
(3) Facilitate agreements between the captive insurance company
and other insurers and reinsurers;
(4)(A) Facilitate contracts, agreements, and procurements on
behalf of the captive insurance company to effectuate this chapter, including
without limitation contracting with financial consultants, investment
consultants, actuaries, auditors, accountants, brokers, adjusters, attorneys,
third-party administrators, and other contractors as necessary to carry out
the duties and responsibilities of establishing, implementing, and
administering the captive insurance company.
(B) Payment for expenses for these services may come from
the State Captive Insurance Program Trust Fund under § 19-5-1161 or the
assets of the captive insurance company;
(5) Prepare or assist in the preparation of financial statements
and reports of financial condition;
(6) Maintain or assist in maintaining accounting for the captive
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
insurance company;
(7) Ensure the captive insurance company's compliance with
applicable laws and rules;
(8) Perform other duties or actions necessary for the effective
implementation, operation, and administration of the captive insurance
company;
(9) Recommend a minimum reserve balance for the State Captive
Insurance Program Trust Fund;
(10) Enforce the prohibition of the employment of a public
adjuster by a public school that is utilizing the State Captive Insurance
Program;
(11) Coordinate with the Commission for Arkansas Public School
Academic Facilities and Transportation to ensure timely and proper
inspections of public schools participating in the program;
(12) Require every public school or state agency with state-
owned property to furnish to the secretary a complete list showing the
location of every building located on a public school or state agency's real
property; and
(13) Employ necessary adjusters, engineers, appraisers, and
other personnel required in the administration of this subchapter.
(b) Funds received by the captive insurance company shall be:
(1) Used exclusively for the purposes and activities stated in
this chapter; and
(2) Invested and reinvested in the name of the captive insurance
company according to the business plan that is submitted by the captive
insurance and approved by the State Insurance Department to ensure the
investments provide the greatest benefit for the captive insurance company.
(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:
(1) A reserve balance remaining unexpended at the end of a
fiscal year in the captive insurance company's fund or account does not
revert to the General Revenue Fund Account, but is carried forward into the
subsequent fiscal year; and
(2) Interest accruing on investments and deposits of the captive
insurance company shall:
(A) Be credited to the captive insurance company's fund or
account;
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
(B) Not revert to the General Revenue Fund Account; and
(C) Be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.
(d)(1) The captive insurance company shall maintain a policy that is
consistent with the state's claims administration process under the Arkansas
Insurance Code and other applicable laws and rules related to the adjustment,
adjudication, and settlement of claims filed against the state.
(2) The granting or denial of claims filed pursuant to the
captive insurance company's policy shall be done according to the Arkansas
Insurance Code and other applicable laws and rules.
(e) The captive insurance company established under § 19-3-706 is
subject to:
(1) Applicable laws and rules that apply to captive insurers
under § 23-63-1601 et seq. and the applicable laws and rules governing the
captive insurance company's business structure unless specifically exempted;
and
(2) An annual audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(f) The captive insurance company shall file annually a copy of the
examination performed by the State Insurance Department with the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee.
(g) If the captive insurance company established under § 19-3-706
ceases to exist, then its assets remaining after its obligations and
liabilities have been satisfied or discharged shall pass to and become the
property of the Restricted Reserve Fund under § 19-5-1263.

25-44-105. Creation — Office of Property Risk.
(a) There is created within the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services the Office of Property Risk that shall administer the State
Captive Insurance Program.
(b) The program shall be administered by the Secretary of the
Department of Shared Services that shall employ a director and administrative
staff in such numbers as are necessary to carry out this subchapter.

25-44-106. Reserve balance — Funding mechanism established to maintain
reserve balance — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “reserve balance” means the amount in a
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
fund that includes the existing balance, minus the claims that have been
incurred but not reported, case reserves, and unearned premium reserves for
each year for the State Captive Insurance Program.
(b)(1) Beginning on December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall take
any actions necessary to achieve and maintain an optimal reserve balance to
ensure the solvency of the program as actuarially determined and commensurate
with the insured exposure.
(2) As of December 1, 2025, an optimal reserve balance amount is
no less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or no more than seventy-five
million dollars ($75,000,000).
(3) The secretary shall annually establish an optimal reserve
balance to ensure solvency of the program as actuarially determined and
commensurate with the insured exposure of the program with the approval of
the State Board of Finance and the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(c) Annually by December 1, the secretary shall:
(1) Calculate the projected reserve balance for:
(A) The remaining calendar year; and
(B) The next three (3) calendar years;
(2) Determine whether the amount of revenue collected by the
secretary is projected to satisfy the optimal reserve balance for the program
established under subdivision (b)(1) of this section for the remaining
calendar year;
(3) Notify the board and the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, of the projected
reserve balance for the remaining calendar year as described in subdivision
(c)(1)(A) of this section; and
(4) Submit for prior approval by the board and the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee, his or her plan to achieve or maintain the optimal reserve
balance.
(d) If the secretary's determination under subdivision (c)(2) of this
section does not equal or exceed the acceptable reserve balance amount as
described in subdivision (b)(3) of this section, the secretary shall notify
the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
Budget Committee, of the need to convene to consider providing additional
funding.
(e)(1) If during the Legislative Council's or, if the General Assembly
is in session, the Joint Budget Committee's, review of the secretary's
determination as required under subdivision (c)(4) of this section it is
determined that additional funding is needed to maintain the acceptable
reserve balance amount as described in subdivision (b)(3) of this section,
the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee, may:
(A) Recommend that the Governor call an extraordinary
session of the General Assembly; or
(B) Take further action as may be appropriate.
(2) If the General Assembly fails to provide funding by March 1
following the Legislative Council's or, if the General Assembly is in
session, the Joint Budget Committee's review, the secretary shall initiate a
process to collect the required additional revenue from program participants
through premium rate increases or reducing program benefits, or both, for the
next plan year.
(f)(1) If the secretary determines that the reserve balance for the
program will exceed seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000), the secretary
may elect to use the excess reserve balance by lowering the premium rates for
the next plan year with prior approval from the Legislative Council or, if
the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(2) If the secretary does not elect to use the excess reserve
balance in the manner prescribed under subdivision (f)(1) of this section,
the secretary shall report to the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, the reason for the
secretary's decision not to use the excess reserve balance.

25-44-107. Accountability — Legislative oversight — Transparency —
Annual reports — Definition.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services and the State Board of Finance shall report annually to the
Legislative Council, or if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee, on the status of the State Captive Insurance Program.
(b) The annual report required under subsection (a) of this section
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
shall:
(1) Be known as the "State Captive Insurance Program Annual
Report";
(2) Be submitted to the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, no later than thirty (30)
calendar days after the end of each plan year; and
(3) Include without limitation the following information
regarding the program:
(A) A detailed statement of investments and earnings;
(B) A new or significantly modified cost-containment
measure;
(C) Any change in plan options offered under the program;
(D) Potential funding changes to the program;
(E) Any premium increases or decreases over the previous
plan year;
(F) Any concern involving the reserve balance for the
program;
(G) Changes to the current calendar year projections and
the three-year projections for the program;
(H) Changes that would limit, eliminate, or increase
benefits of plan options offered under the program and the impact these
changes would have on the fiscal viability of the program, including the
reserve balance for the program;
(I) Changes that would limit, eliminate, or increase
eligibility requirements for the program;
(J) Vendor or broker issues or changes in vendors or
brokers from the previous year;
(K) Proposed contracts or changes in contracts from the
previous year;
(L) Any change in consultants from the previous year;
(M) Rules promulgated by the Department of Transformation
and Shared Services or the secretary regarding the implementation,
administration, or enforcement of the program; and
(N) Such other matters related to the program as the
Legislative Council considers necessary to perform its oversight of all
matters related to the program.
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481

25-44-108. Finding of uninsurability — Effect.
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services may maintain an inspection and engineering service designed to
reduce the hazards in buildings insured under the State Captive Insurance
Program.
(2) Upon review of the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, the secretary may:
(A) Cancel or choose to not renew insurance on any insured
entity's property if the property is deemed no longer insurable; and
(B) Refuse to insure property when it determines that the
property does not meet program guidelines.
(b) In carrying out his or her duties under this section, the
secretary may request, and the insured entity shall provide, any information
requested for a determination concerning the reasons for the denial,
nonrenewal, or cancellation of insurance coverage.

25-44-109. Premium rate and payment.
(a) The premium rate established under this chapter shall be
actuarially determined and commensurate with the insured exposure.
(b) An insured entity shall make payment of the insured entity's
premium when demand is made as scheduled in the contract.
(c)(1) An insured entity that does not pay the premium when due shall
be charged a rate of interest at five percent (5%) per annum on all payments
due and unpaid on the policy issued.
(2) If an insured entity does not pay the premium due within
thirty (30) days, the insurance coverage may be canceled upon thirty (30)
days' notice.

25-44-110. Public insurance adjuster — Prohibited.
The use of a public insurance adjuster or any type of public adjusting
is prohibited by an insured entity under the State Captive Insurance Program.

25-44-111. Expeditious claims filing.
A claim made under the State Captive Insurance Program is required to
be filed no later than one (1) year after the loss is incurred.
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481

SECTION 25. DO NOT CODIFY. Severability.
The provisions of this act shall be severable, and if any phrase,
clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining
provisions of the act shall be enforceable.

SECTION 26. DO NOT CODIFY. Transitional provision for outstanding
claims.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services shall promulgate rules to address the filing dates for a property
claim that is incurred but not reported under the Public Elementary and
Secondary School Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq. or the Arkansas Multi-
Agency Insurance Trust Fund Act, § 25-35-101 et seq., once the State Captive
Insurance Program is operational.
(b) At a date to be determined by the secretary by rule, a property
claim shall be adjusted and paid, under the:
(1) Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Act, § 6-
20-1501 et seq.; or
(2) Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund Act, § 25-35-101
et seq.
(c)(1) The Arkansas School Boards Association shall be responsible for
a property claim that is incurred before the State Captive Insurance Program
is operational but has not been reported under the plan that is administered
by the Arkansas School Boards Association and the property claim shall be
adjusted and paid under the plan that is administered by the Arkansas School
Boards Association.
(2) The State Captive Insurance Program is not responsible for a
property claim that is incurred on the date determined by the secretary under
subsection (b) of this section that has not been reported under the plan that
is administered by the Arkansas School Boards Association.
(d) A property claim that is incurred on and after a date to be
determined by the secretary by rule shall be filed with the State Captive
Insurance Program.

SECTION 27. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an instability in the property
03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286

SB481
insurance industry has led to increases in costs for public schools, state-
supported institutions of higher education, and taxpayers for state-owned
property; that these increases are not sustainable under the current system;
that a new system for property insurance for public schools, state-supported
institutions of higher education, and state-owned property is needed to
alleviate the impact of high costs and provide a greater amount of certainty
concerning costs; and that this act is immediately necessary because it
establishes a new system for property insurance for public schools, stae-
supported institutions of higher education, and state-owned property to allow
for better utilization of state resources and greater control to regulate
costs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

















03/17/2025 3:20:39 PM ANS286